Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.340

Violations deemed unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW—Application of chapter 9.04 RCW—Procedure.

(1) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) The secretary may refer such evidence, as may be available, concerning violations of this chapter to the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of the county wherein the alleged violation arose. In addition to any other action they might commence, the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney may bring an action in the name of the state, with or without such reference, against any entity to restrain and prevent the doing of any act or practice prohibited by this chapter: PROVIDED, That this chapter shall be considered in conjunction with chapters 9.04 and 19.86 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, and the powers and duties of the attorney general and the prosecuting attorney as they may appear in the aforementioned chapters, shall apply against all entities subject to this chapter.

[ 2011 c 199 s 25; 1983 c 265 s 12; 1982 c 227 s 13; 1973 1st ex.s. c 13 s 34.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 227: See note following RCW 19.09.100.